incubator/apertium-la-es/apertium-la-es.la.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzŀlāēīōū</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="abl"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>

    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>

    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>

    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>

    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>

    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>

    <sdef n="num"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>

    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="ftp"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="impf"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="infp"/>
    <sdef n="pmp"/>
    <sdef n="pms"/>
    <sdef n="pfs"/>
    <sdef n="pfut"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="act"/>
    <sdef n="psv"/>
    <sdef n="spn"/>
    <sdef n="fut"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>

    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>

    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>

    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"/>
    <sdef n="elip"/>
    <sdef n="quot"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bible_abbrev">
      <e><i>Io</i></e>
      <e><i>Act</i></e>
      <e><i>1<b/>Tim</i></e>
      <e><i>Mt</i></e>
      <e><i>Mc</i></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bible">
      <e>
        <par n="bible_abbrev"/>
        <i><b/></i>
        <re>[0-9]+,([0-9])+(\-[0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->  
    <pardef n="ab__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="et__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ut__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quasi__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="long/e__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issime</l>
          <r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="audac/iter__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iter</l>
          <r>iter<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>iter<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issime</l>
          <r>iter<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cert/o__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>o<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issime</l>
          <r>o<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tunc__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que__enc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>que</l>
          <r><j/>que<s n="enc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="absque"><i>absque</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ad"><i>ad</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prae"><i>prae</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="praeter"><i>praeter</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iuntus"><i>iuntus</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cause"><i>cause</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="palam"><i>palam</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="abs"><i>abs</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="adversus"><i>adversus</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ante"><i>ante</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="apud"><i>apud</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="causa"><i>causa</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circa"><i>circa</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circiter"><i>circiter</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="circum"><i>circum</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cis"><i>cis</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="citra"><i>citra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="clam"><i>clam</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="contra"><i>contra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="coram"><i>coram</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cum"><i>cum</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="de"><i>de</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ex"><i>ex</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="gratia"><i>gratia</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="infra"><i>infra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="intra"><i>intra</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ob"><i>ob</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="per"><i>per</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="post"><i>post</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="procul"><i>procul</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="propter"><i>propter</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sine"><i>sine</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="super"><i>super</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="trans"><i>trans</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="usque"><i>usque</i><par n="ab__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="et"><i>et</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ac"><i>ac</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="atque"><i>atque</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="atqui"><i>atqui</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="atquin"><i>atquin</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aut"><i>aut</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nec"><i>nec</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="neque"><i>neque</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vel"><i>vel</i><par n="et__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="antequam"><i>antequam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cur"><i>cur</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="donec"><i>donec</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etiamsi"><i>etiamsi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="etsi"><i>etsi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nisi"><i>nisi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nonne"><i>nonne</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="posteaquam"><i>posteaquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="postquam"><i>postquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="praeterquam"><i>praeterquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="priusquam"><i>priusquam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quamvis"><i>quamvis</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quando"><i>quando</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quia"><i>quia</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quoniam"><i>quoniam</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sed"><i>sed</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="si"><i>si</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sicut"><i>sicut</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sicuti"><i>sicuti</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ubi"><i>ubi</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="unde"><i>unde</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ut"><i>ut</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="propterea"><i>propterea</i><par n="ut__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="longe"><i>long</i><par n="long/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="adsidue"><i>adsidu</i><par n="long/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="infinite"><i>infinit</i><par n="long/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="libere"><i>liber</i><par n="long/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="audaciter"><i>audac</i><par n="audac/iter__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="certo"><i>cert</i><par n="cert/o__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cito"><i>cit</i><par n="cert/o__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="adhuc"><i>adhuc</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="alioquin"><i>alioquin</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aliquotiens"><i>aliquotiens</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="amen"><i>amen</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aperte"><i>aperte</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="atquin"><i>atquin</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="breviter"><i>breviter</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="clementer"><i>clementer</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="denique"><i>denique</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="enim"><i>enim</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="fortasse"><i>fortasse</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="haud"><i>haud</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="item"><i>item</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="inde"><i>inde</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="interim"><i>interim</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="itaque"><i>itaque</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="magis"><i>magis</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nam"><i>nam</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="nunc"><i>nunc</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="partim"><i>partim</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="procul"><i>procul</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="quoque"><i>quoque</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="sensim"><i>sensim</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="superius"><i>superius</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tamen"><i>tamen</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tunc"><i>tunc</i><par n="tunc__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ubertim"><i>ubertim</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="utique"><i>utique</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="valde"><i>valde</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vix"><i>vix</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="temporaliter"><i>temporaliter</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="a.C.n"><i>a.C.n</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ab aeterno"><i>ab<b/>aeterno</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Anno Domini"><i>Anno<b/>Domini</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="et alii"><i>et<b/>alii</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Senatus Populus Que Romanus"><i>Senatus<b/>Populus<b/>Que<b/>Romanus</i><par n="quasi__adv"/></e>
    <e><par n="bible"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
